California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding any other law, if (a) a member or beneficiary whose effective date for a benefit received pursuant to any other chapter of this part was prior to January 1, 2010, (b) the member or beneficiary was required to receive a distribution of the balance of credits from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account pursuant to this chapter, and (c) the member or beneficiary failed to submit an application for the distribution of the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account prior to January 1, 2010, the system shall distribute the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account in a lump-sum payment to the member or beneficiary, as applicable, by March 31, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 27.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Benefits [25009. - 25011.6.]

25009.

(a) A member’s retirement benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall be an amount equal to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the retirement benefit becomes payable.

(b) A retirement benefit shall be a lump-sum payment, or an annuity payable in monthly installments, or a combination of both a lump-sum payment and an annuity, as elected by the member on the application for a retirement benefit. Any retirement benefit paid as an annuity under this chapter shall be subject to Section 25011 or 25011.1.

(c) Upon distribution of the entire retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment, no other benefit shall be payable to the member or the member’s beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(d) A member may not apply a lump-sum payment made to the member pursuant to this section for any of the following purposes:

 (1) Purchasing service credit pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800), Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820), or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 22850).

(2) Redepositing previously refunded retirement contributions pursuant to Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 323, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25010.

(a) A member who meets the following eligibility requirements shall receive a retirement benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program:

(1) The member has terminated all employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan. The member’s employer, or employers if the member has multiple employers, shall certify on a form prescribed by the system that the member’s employment has been terminated.

(2) The member has retired for service under the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201).

(b) A member shall submit an application for a
 retirement benefit on a form prescribed by the system.

(c) A member retiring for service pursuant to Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201) on or after January 1, 2010, shall not receive an allowance pursuant to Chapter 27 unless the member has submitted a completed application pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 28.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25011.

(a) A member or nonmember spouse may elect to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity payable in monthly installments, provided the balance of credits in the member’s or nonmember spouse’s respective Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the retirement benefit becomes payable equals at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) after any lump-sum payments have been made from the account.

(b) If the member elects to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity, the member shall elect one of the following forms of payment:

(1) A single life annuity without a cash refund feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the member if
 the member elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the member, no other benefit shall be payable to the member’s beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(2) A single life annuity with a cash refund feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the member if the member elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the member, an amount equal to the remaining balance, if any, of credits transferred from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve shall be returned in a lump-sum payment to the member’s beneficiary.

(3) A 100-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the
 member and the member’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the member, the same monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the member’s surviving annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member, the annuity payable to the member shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the member elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member and the member designates a new option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, the new option beneficiary shall be the new annuity
 beneficiary. The effective date shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is received by the board, provided both the member and the new annuity beneficiary are then living. The new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph is subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and may not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary may not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(4) A 50-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the member, one-half of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the member’s surviving annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member, the
 annuity payable to the member shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the member elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member and the member designates a new option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, the new option beneficiary shall be the new annuity beneficiary. The effective date shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is received by the board, provided both the member and the new annuity beneficiary are then living. The new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph
 is subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and may not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary may not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(5) A period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the retirement benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the member, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years subject to life expectancy tables promulgated pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the member’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary pursuant to Section 25022.

(c) If a nonmember spouse elects to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity, the nonmember spouse shall elect the form of payment specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (5) of subdivision (b) and, in those paragraphs, references to a “member” shall apply to the nonmember spouse.

(d) On or after January 1, 2007, a member may not make a new election of a joint and survivor annuity described in subdivision (b), except as provided by subdivision (e) of Section 25011.1.

(e) Any member with a retirement effective on or after January 1, 2007, shall elect an annuity from the annuities described in Section 25011.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 18.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25011.1.

(a) A member may elect to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity payable in monthly installments, provided the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the retirement benefit becomes payable equals at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) after any lump-sum payments have been made from the account. If the member elects to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity, the member shall elect one of the following forms of payments:

(1) Member only annuity. This is a single life annuity with a cash refund feature that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the retired member if the member elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the member,
 an amount equal to the remaining balance of credits, if any, transferred from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve shall be returned in a lump-sum payment to the beneficiary of the member.

(2) One hundred percent beneficiary annuity. This is a joint and survivor annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries. Upon the death of the member, 100 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the surviving annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries of the member.

(3) Seventy-five percent beneficiary annuity. This is a joint and survivor annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity
 beneficiary. Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, the member shall not elect this annuity if a beneficiary is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member, unless the beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse and the election is pursuant to a determination of community property rights. Upon the death of the member, 75 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the surviving annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries of the member.

(4) Fifty percent beneficiary annuity. This is a joint and survivor annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries. Upon the death of the member, 50 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the surviving annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries of the member.

(5) A period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the retirement benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the member, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years subject to life expectancy tables promulgated pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the member’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary pursuant to Section 25022.

(b) If an annuity beneficiary designated pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) predeceases the member, the annuity shall be paid to the member as the member only annuity that would have been payable had the member
 elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That member only annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member and the member designates a new option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, the new option beneficiary shall be the new annuity beneficiary. The effective date shall be six months following the date notification is received by the board, provided both the member and the new annuity beneficiary are then living. Notice to the board of the death of the annuity beneficiary shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system. The new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph is subject to an actuarial modification of the member only annuity and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(c) If a nonmember spouse elects to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity, the nonmember spouse shall elect the form of payment specified in paragraph (1) or (5) of subdivision (a) and, in those paragraphs, references to a “member” shall apply to the nonmember spouse.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, a spouse as described in paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (a) does not include the domestic partner of the member, pursuant to Section 7 of Title 1 of the United States Code.

(e) If there is a determination of community property rights as described in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 22650) of this part on or before December 31, 2006, the member may elect the annuity that is required by the judgment or court order. This part does not permit the member to change the annuity to the
 detriment of the community property interest of the nonmember spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 40.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25011.5.

(a) A member who retired and elected an annuity pursuant to Section 25011 may elect to change annuities, subject to all of the following:

(1) A member who elected a single life annuity with or without a cash refund feature or elects a period certain annuity may not change his or her annuity.

(2) A member who elected an annuity under paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 25011 may elect an annuity under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25011.1.

(3) The election by the member under this section is made on or after January 1, 2007,
 and prior to July 1, 2007.

(4) The member designates the same beneficiary that was designated under the prior annuity election by the member, if the annuity and annuity designation was effective on December 31, 2006.

(5) The member and the annuity beneficiary are not afflicted with a known terminal illness and the member declares, under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state, that to the best of his or her knowledge, he or she and the annuity beneficiary are not afflicted with a known terminal illness.

(6) The annuity beneficiary has not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the change in the annuity by the member.

(b) The change in the annuity by the member shall be effective on the date the election is signed, provided that the
 election is on a properly executed form provided by the system and that election is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date the election is signed.

(c) After receipt of a member’s election document, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the member that sets forth the new annuity elected by the member.

(d) If the member and the annuity beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, a member may cancel the election to change annuities and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting annuity election. After cancellation, the member may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting annuity to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change shall be made on a properly
 executed form provided by the system and shall be received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the member elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the member’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(e) If the system is unable to mail an acknowledgment notice to the member on or before June 1, 2007, or prior to the end of the election period, provided that the member and the annuity beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, the system shall allow a member to cancel the election to change annuities and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting annuity election. After cancellation, the member may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting annuity to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph (1),
 (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change may be made after the end of the election period if it is made on a properly executed form provided by the system and is received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the member elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the member’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(f) If the member elects to change his or her annuity as described in subdivision (a), the annuity of the member shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(g) References to a “member” in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall apply to the nonmember spouse.

(h) The member shall not change annuities in derogation of a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 48.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25011.6.

(a) A member who retired and elected a beneficiary annuity pursuant to Section 25011.1 with his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse designated as annuity beneficiary pursuant to Section 25015 may elect to change his or her annuity subject to the following:

(1) A member who elected the 100 percent beneficiary annuity or the 50 percent beneficiary annuity may elect to change his or her beneficiary annuity to the 75 percent beneficiary annuity described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25011.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(2) (A) A member who elected the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 may elect to change his or her beneficiary annuity to the 100 percent beneficiary annuity described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25011.1, or the 75 percent beneficiary annuity described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25011.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 10 years younger than the member under the 100 percent beneficiary annuity, or more than exactly 19 years younger than the member under the 75 percent beneficiary annuity.

(B) Any change made pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements and restrictions of Section 25015.

(3) The annuity change made by the member pursuant to this section is made on or after July 1, 2015, and
 on or before December 31, 2015.

(4) The member married a same-sex spouse, the marriage is or was recognized by the United States government, any state government, or any foreign government, and his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse was designated as his or her annuity beneficiary prior to July 1, 2015.

(5) The same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is a current annuity beneficiary, and the same annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries that were designated for the prior annuity elected by the member remain.

(6) The annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries have not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the annuity change made by the member pursuant to this section.

(b) The annuity change made by a member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed effective as of the
 effective date of the prior annuity election or June 26, 2013, whichever is later.

(c) The annuity change made by the member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system subject to the following requirements:

(1) The form is signed and dated by the member and the member’s spouse, if applicable, on or after July 1, 2015, and on or before December 31, 2015.

(2) The date the form is received at the system’s headquarters office is within 30 calendar days after the date of the member’s signature and within 30 calendar days after the date of the spouse’s signature, if applicable.

(d) After
 receipt of a member’s election, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the member that sets forth the new annuity elected by the member.

(e) A member may cancel an annuity change made pursuant to subdivision (a) and elect to receive his or her benefit according to his or her prior annuity election provided the requirements of paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (a) are still met. The cancellation shall become effective as of the date of the initial annuity change pursuant to subdivision (b) subject to the following requirements:

(1) The cancellation is made on a properly executed form provided by the system.

(2) The form includes the signatures of the member and his or her spouse, if applicable, and the
 signatures are dated.

(3) The form is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 calendar days after the date of the acknowledgment notice described in subdivision (d), regardless of whether the form is received after December 31, 2015.

(f) A member may cancel an initial annuity change made pursuant to subdivision (a) and elect to make one subsequent change from his or her prior annuity election to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of subdivision (a). The subsequent change shall become effective as of the date of the initial annuity change pursuant to subdivision (b) and subject to the following requirements:

(1) The cancellation and subsequent change are made on a properly
 executed form provided by the system.

(2) The form includes the signatures of the member and his or her spouse, if applicable, and the signatures are dated.

(3) The form is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 calendar days after the date of the acknowledgment notice described in subdivision (d), regardless of whether the form is received after December 31, 2015.

(g) If a member elects to change his or her annuity pursuant to subdivision (a) or (f), the member’s annuity shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(h) A member shall not change his or her annuity in derogation
 of a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 70.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Annuities [25012. - 25015.]

25012.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an annuity payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall be determined as a value actuarially equivalent to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement Program account on the member’s retirement date and after any lump-sum payment. If a single life annuity is elected, the annuity shall be calculated using the age of the member on the member’s retirement date. A member may elect a single life annuity only if the member did not elect to receive a modified allowance pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1. If a joint and survivor annuity is elected, the annuity
 shall be calculated using the age of the member and the age of the member’s beneficiary on the member’s annuity effective date. A member may elect a joint and survivor annuity only if the member elected to receive a modified allowance pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1.

(b) If a member elected to receive an annuity pursuant to Section 25018 or 25018.1, and if the member is still receiving the annuity at the time the member’s disability allowance is terminated pursuant to Section 24213, the annuity already in effect shall continue upon the member’s service retirement provided the member’s service retirement benefit effective date is the day after the disability
 allowance termination date. 

(c) The beneficiary designation made pursuant to Section 24307 is not applicable to benefits payable under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 20.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25013.

Upon election by the member to receive a benefit payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program in the form of an annuity, the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account shall be transferred to the Annuitant Reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25014.

(a) If a member reinstates from service retirement under this part, payment of a retirement annuity based on the balance of credits that was transferred from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve shall terminate. The member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account shall be credited with the actuarial equivalent of the member’s annuity as of the date the annuity is terminated and the Annuitant Reserve shall be reduced by the amount credited to the member’s account.

(b) If the member subsequently retires again, an annuity or lump-sum payment based on the remaining balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account at the time of the subsequent retirement shall become payable pursuant to Section 24202.5 and the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account shall be transferred to the Annuitant Reserve or paid to the member in the form of a lump-sum payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25015.

(a) If a member elects to receive a benefit payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program as a joint and survivor annuity, the designation of the beneficiary made pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1 shall apply to the benefit payable under this chapter. The annuity beneficiary designation shall not be changed after the date the benefit becomes payable to the member, except as provided in Section 24320, 24321, 24322, 24323, 24324, 25011, 25011.1, 25018, or 25018.1, or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 22650).

(b) If the member designates one or multiple option beneficiaries within Option 8 pursuant to Section 24300 or the compound option pursuant to Section 24300.1, the percentage of the unmodified allowance attributable to each option beneficiary specified
 in that designation shall apply to the joint and survivor annuity payable under this chapter. The member shall elect one joint and survivor annuity type and this annuity type shall be applied the same for each beneficiary and each designated percentage of the member only annuity. If any percentage of the allowance was designated to remain unmodified, the member only annuity shall apply for the corresponding percentage of the annuity provided under this chapter. The annuity amount payable to the member during the member’s lifetime shall be modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(1) Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, the member shall not designate the 100-percent beneficiary annuity type under this subdivision if any annuity beneficiary is more than exactly 10 years younger than the member, unless that annuity beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former
 spouse who has been awarded a community property interest in the member’s benefits under this part.

(2) Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, the member shall not designate the 75-percent beneficiary annuity type under this subdivision if any annuity beneficiary is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member, unless that annuity beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse who has been awarded a community property interest in the member’s benefits under this part.

(c) (1) If the member predeceases an annuity beneficiary, the annuity beneficiary may designate, on a properly executed form provided by the system, a payee to receive an amount that may be payable in a lump sum pursuant to Section 25023 upon the death of the annuity beneficiary.

(2) Unless otherwise
 specified in the trust instrument, the trustee or beneficiary of the trust that is an annuity beneficiary is entitled to name a subsequent beneficiary if the trust is valid. If the trust is determined to be invalid or terminates, any election by the trustee pursuant to this paragraph shall be void and the beneficiary shall be entitled to exercise all rights provided to annuity beneficiaries under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 41.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disability Benefits [25016. - 25019.]

25016.

(a) A member’s disability benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall be an amount equal to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable.

(b) A disability benefit shall be a lump-sum payment, or an annuity payable in monthly installments, or a combination of both a lump-sum payment and an annuity, as elected by the member on the application for a disability benefit. Any retirement benefit paid as an annuity under this chapter shall be subject to Section 25018 or 25018.1.

(c) Upon distribution of the entire disability benefit in a lump-sum payment, no other benefit shall be payable to the member or the member’s beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25017.

(a) A member shall receive a disability benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program beginning on the effective date of the member’s disability allowance pursuant to Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 24001) or a disability retirement allowance pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100) under the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) The member, or the member’s employer or conservator on behalf of the member, shall submit an application for a disability benefit on a form prescribed by the system.

(c) A member whose disability allowance or disability retirement allowance is effective on or after January 1, 2010, shall not receive an allowance pursuant
 to Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 24001) or Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100), as applicable, unless the member has submitted a completed application pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 30.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25018.

(a) A member may elect to receive the disability benefit as an annuity, payable in monthly installments, provided the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable equals at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) after any lump-sum payment has been made from this account.

(b) If the member elects to receive the disability benefit as an annuity, the member shall elect one of the following forms of payment:

(1) A single life annuity without a cash refund feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the member if the member elected to receive the disability benefit
 in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the member, no other benefit shall be payable to the member’s beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(2) A single life annuity with a cash refund feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the member if the member elected to receive the disability benefit in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the member, an amount equal to the remaining balance of credits, if any, transferred from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve shall be returned in a lump-sum payment to the member’s beneficiary.

(3) For a member receiving an allowance pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100), a 100-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be
 payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the member, the same monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the member’s surviving annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member, the annuity payable to the member shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the member elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member and the member designates a new option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, the new
 option beneficiary shall be the new annuity beneficiary. The effective date shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is received by the board, provided both the member and the new annuity beneficiary are then living. The new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph shall be subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(4) For a member receiving an allowance pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100), a 50-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the member, one-half of the monthly amount that was payable to
 the member shall be paid monthly to the member’s surviving annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member, the annuity payable to the member shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the member elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member and the member designates a new option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, the new option beneficiary shall be the new annuity beneficiary. The effective date shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is
 received by the board, provided both the member and the new annuity beneficiary are then living. The new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph shall be subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(5) A period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the member, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years subject to life expectancy tables promulgated pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the member’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain, the remaining
 balance of payments shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary pursuant to Section 25022.

(c) Except as described in subdivision (d) of Section 25018.1, on or after January 1, 2007, a member may not make a new election for an annuity described in subdivision (b).

(d) On or after January 1, 2007, a member may not make a new election of a joint and survivor annuity described in subdivision (b), except as provided by subdivision (e) of Section 25018.1.

(e) Any member with a disability benefit effective on or after January 1, 2007, shall elect an annuity from the annuities described in Section 25018.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 22.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25018.1.

(a) A member may elect to receive the disability benefit as an annuity, payable in monthly installments, provided the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable equals at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) after any lump-sum payment has been made from this account. If the member elects to receive the disability benefit as an annuity, the member shall elect one of the following forms of payment:

(1) Member only annuity. This is a single life annuity with a cash refund feature that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the member if the member elected to receive the disability benefit in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the member, an
 amount equal to the remaining balance of credits, if any, transferred from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve shall be returned in a lump-sum payment to the member’s beneficiary.

(2) One hundred percent beneficiary annuity. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries. Upon the death of the member, 100 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the member’s surviving annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries.
